Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 70 of Title 62, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Treasurer or a third-party vendor contracted by
the Treasurer's office, shall be authorized to issue a transaction
card to United States citizens with the ability to make purchases
Req. No. 12932 Page 1

that are debited from the balance of deposits with a bullion
depository created by the Treasurer’s office or contracted with
other public or private entities operating a bullion depository.
B. Upon the creation of a depository or a contractual agreement
with an entity pursuant to subsection A of this section, the
Treasurer’s office shall:
1. Provide procedures for the sharing of account information
between the depository and the Treasurer upon consent of the account
holder; and
2. Develop a fee structure for both the depository and the
Treasurer, to be paid by the account holder, to utilize the service
provided by a bullion depository.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 70.1 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Deposits of gold and silver in the bullion depository and
transactions made using the transaction card issued by the State
Treasurer shall be considered legal tender, pursuant to the
authority vested upon this state in Section 10 of Article I of the
United States Constitution. Deposits of gold and silver in the
bullion depository shall not be considered a commodity. The
transfer, buying, or selling of gold and silver held in the
depository for transactions shall not be considered an exchange of a
commodity, and shall be considered an exchange of currency.
Req. No. 12932 Page 2

B. Account holders issued a transaction card may make
transactions debited against the value of gold and silver deposits
in the bullion depository.
C. The Treasurer may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12932 MJ 02/25/25
















Req. No. 12932 Page 3